Louisiana, session 2026, HB284.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XIII of Title 19 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised
of R.S. 19:396 through 396.12, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XIII. EXPROPRIATION OF ABANDONED OR BLIGHTED PROPERTY
BY A DECLARATION OF TAKING BY PARISHES AND MUNICIPALITIES
WITH A POPULATION OF LESS THAN FIFTY THOUSAND
§396. Purpose
In an effort to control the rising number of abandoned or blighted properties
throughout the state and to slow urban blight, the Legislature of Louisiana finds it
necessary to implement a mechanism by which parishes and municipalities with a
population of less than fifty thousand are empowered to more readily obtain
abandoned or blighted properties. The provisions of this Part serve a public purpose,
protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public, and are intended to provide a
means by which governing authorities may revitalize economically depressed areas
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
by placing abandoned or blighted properties back into the economic stream of
commerce through the rehabilitation of the abandoned or blighted property. The
procedure created by this Part shall be in addition to any other procedure authorized
by law.
§396.1. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, unless the context clearly otherwise requires or
unless otherwise defined in specific portions of this Part, the following words or
phrases have the respective meanings:
(1)(a) "Abandoned property" means any commercial or residential property
that is vacant or not lawfully occupied. The terms "vacant" or "not lawfully
occupied" have the same meanings and circumstances described in R.S. 33:1236(49),
4720.59, and 4754 and include any or all of the following property conditions:
(i) Not actually occupied by the owner, lessee, or an authorized occupant.
(ii) Lacking customary utility service or has been left unsecured or
inadequately secured from unauthorized entry such that the premises may be entered
and utilized by vagrants or other uninvited persons as a place of harborage.
(iii) Deemed detrimental to or endangers the public safety, health, or welfare
by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, disrepair, neglect, damage, vacancy,
abandonment, or other condition.
(iv) Determined to be unfit for human occupancy, unsafe structures,
unlawful structures, structures containing unsafe equipment, or housing code
violations as those terms may be defined by state law, local ordinances, or applicable
building, housing, fire, or health codes.
(v) Considered a public nuisance under state law, local ordinance, or
applicable administrative or judicial determination.
(vi) Deemed uninhabitable or that presents a threat to public health or safety
because of the physical condition, use, or disuse.
(b) Property that is uninhabitable and for which ad valorem taxes have been
delinquent for three or more years may be presumed to be abandoned. However, the
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
presumption shall be rebuttable. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to limit
the authority of a governing authority to determine abandonment under other
applicable provisions of law.
(2)(a) "Blighted property" means any commercial or residential premises
including buildings, structures, or vacant lots, which because of physical condition,
use, or neglect are detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, impair
the economic stability of the surrounding area, or constitute a blighting influence on
nearby properties. The term includes any or all of the following property conditions:
(i) Has been declared vacant, uninhabitable, hazardous, or blighted by a
court of competent jurisdiction, an administrative hearing officer acting pursuant to
R.S. 13:2575 or 2576, or any other applicable law.
(ii) Has been determined to be a public nuisance, fire hazard, environmental
hazard, or threat to public health or safety pursuant to state law or a local ordinance.
(iii) Contains or constitutes an unsafe structure, unlawful structure, structure
unfit for human occupancy, or structure containing unsafe equipment as defined by
applicable state law, building codes, housing codes, fire codes, or local ordinances.
(iv) Is dilapidated, decayed, deteriorated, structurally unsafe, vermin-infested,
unsanitary, lacking essential utilities or facilities, or otherwise maintained in a
condition detrimental to public health, safety, welfare, or the economic stability of
the community.
(v) Has been declared or certified blighted, abandoned, deleterious, or
otherwise hazardous pursuant to R.S. 14:107.3, R.S. 33:1373, 1374, 4720.59, R.S.
40:600.33, or other applicable law.
(vi) By reason of physical condition, environmental contamination,
prolonged vacancy, neglect, or failure to maintain the property in accordance with
applicable codes or ordinances, constitutes a threat to persons or property or creates
a blighting influence on surrounding properties.
(b) This definition shall be construed broadly to effectuate the purpose of
addressing abandoned, hazardous, and blighted properties and includes but is not
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
limited to conditions identified under any applicable state statute, local ordinance,
administrative determination, or judicial finding relating to blight, abandonment,
public nuisance, unsafe structures, or similar conditions and other applicable law.
(3) "Governing authority" means the governing authority of any parish or
municipality having a population of less than fifty thousand, according to the latest
federal decennial census, or any assignee which is authorized by the parish or
municipality to carry out the purpose of this Part.
(4) "Notice" means the sending of written communication to a person
entitled to receive notice pursuant to this Part by any of the following methods:
(a) By means of registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to an
owner at the address of the owner listed in the assessor's office for the parish in
which the abandoned or blighted property is located.
(b) In the same manner as service of citation or other process as provided for
in the Code of Civil Procedure and R.S. 13:3201 et seq., whether made by a sheriff,
deputy sheriff, or constable or as otherwise provided by law in any civil matters.
(c) By a duly authorized building inspector or other representative of the
political subdivision, as provided by ordinance.
(d) In the event that the owners are absent or unable to be notified in
accordance with Subparagraphs (4)(a) through (c) of this Section, notice may be
made by publication once a week for two consecutive weeks in an official journal of
the political subdivision in which the property is located.
(5) "Owner" means any person having an ownership interest in the property
as shown in the conveyance records of the parish in which the property is located,
including but not limited to ownership or leasehold interest.
(6) "Property" means any portion of immovable property, including
servitudes, leases, rights-of-way, and other rights in or to immovable property.
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
§396.2. Authority to expropriate; acquisition of abandoned or blighted property
prior to judgment
A. If a governing authority cannot amicably acquire property needed by the
governing authority for the rehabilitation of abandoned or blighted property in order
to return it to commerce, it may acquire the same by expropriation and may acquire
the abandoned or blighted property prior to judgment in the trial court fixing the
amount of compensation due to the owner of the abandoned or blighted property.
B. At least fifteen days prior to filing a petition for expropriation, the
governing authority shall send notice to the owner of its intention to expropriate the
property pursuant to this Part. The letter of notification shall also inform the owner
that if, within fifteen days after being served with the citation and pleading, he does
not object to the taking on the grounds that it is not for a public purpose or fails to
show that the abandoned or blighted conditions of the property have been
substantially rehabilitated and that all taxes and public liens have been paid, he shall
waive all defenses to the taking except claims for compensation or damages.
C. Except for the provisions of R.S. 48:453(E), 456(A)(3) and (B), and as
otherwise provided in this Part, such expropriation by the governing authority shall
be conducted in the manner that the Department of Transportation and Development
may expropriate property for highway purposes, as set forth in R.S. 48:441 through
460.
§396.3. Contents of petition for expropriation; place of filing
The right of expropriation granted by this Part shall be exercised in the
following manner:
(1) A petition shall be filed by the governing authority in the district court
of the parish in which the property to be expropriated is located.
(2) The petition shall contain a statement of the purpose for which the
property is to be expropriated, a legal description of the property being expropriated,
and the name of the record owner or owners.
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
(3) The petition shall have annexed to it the following:
(a) A certified copy of a resolution adopted by the governing authority
generally authorizing the taking of abandoned or blighted property and declaring that
it is necessary or useful for the purposes of this Part.
(b) An itemized statement of the amount of money estimated to be the full
extent of the owner's loss for the actual taking, use, damage, or destruction, as the
case may be. It shall be signed by a qualified and licensed real estate appraiser who
made the estimate and shall include the date on which the appraisal was made.
(c) A copy of the letter of notification of intention to expropriate the
property, as required by R.S. 19:396.2(B), and an affidavit setting forth the efforts
to notify the owner.
§396.4. Prayer of petition; ex parte order for deposit; value determination
The petition shall conclude with a prayer that the abandoned or blighted
property be declared taken for the purpose of rehabilitating economically depressed
property by placing it back into the economic stream of commerce. Upon
presentation of the petition, the court shall issue an order directing that the amount
of the appraisal be deposited in the registry of the court. Upon the deposit of the
amount of the appraisal in the registry of the court, for the use and benefit of the
persons entitled, the clerk shall issue a receipt showing the amount deposited, the
date it was deposited, the style and number of the cause, and the description of the
property as contained in the petition.
§396.5. Vesting of title
Upon presentation of the receipt issued by the clerk of court, the court shall
render an immediate ex parte order transferring and vesting full and complete right,
title, and ownership in and to the property unto the governing authority, free and
clear of all rights of all interested owners, and all such rights and interests shall be
transferred to and attach to the funds on deposit. The rights and interests of all
creditors shall be transferred and attach to the funds on deposit. Upon vesting of
title, the governing authority may enter upon and take possession of the property.
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
§396.6. Notice to defendant
Upon receipt of the deposit and the ex parte order, the clerk of court shall
comply with all laws governing citation as to each named defendant.
§396.7. Contesting validity of proposed taking; waiver of defenses
A. Any defendant desiring to contest and oppose the validity of the taking
on the grounds that the property taken was not expropriated for a public purpose or
the abandoned or blighted conditions of the property have been substantially
rehabilitated, and all taxes and governmental liens have been paid, shall file a motion
to dismiss the taking within fifteen days after the date on which the citation was
served on him or a court-appointed curator on his behalf. The motion to dismiss the
taking shall be served pursuant to Code of Civil Procedure Article 1314. This
motion shall be tried contradictorily as a summary proceeding with preference over
all other matters to the judge alone and shall be decided prior to fixing the case for
trial on the compensation or damages due to the defendant.
B. The ex parte order vesting title in the governing authority shall become
final upon the failure of the defendant to timely file the opposition provided in
Subsection A of this Section. If the defendant files an opposition, the ex parte order
becomes final upon the rendering of a judgment in favor of the governing authority
on the trial of the opposition or as otherwise provided in the Code of Civil Procedure.
§396.8. Defendant's answer; requirements; delay for filing
When property is expropriated pursuant to this Part, any defendant may apply
for a trial to the district court for the parish in which the property is located to
determine the measure of compensation to which he is entitled, if:
(1) The defendant or owner applies for a trial within fifteen days from the
date of service upon him, or a curator ad hoc appointed for him, or within an
extended period of time granted by the court for good cause not to exceed sixty days,
otherwise it shall be conclusively presumed that the amount deposited by the
governing authority is correct and the defendant or owner shall thereafter be barred
from disputing the deposited amount.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
(2) His answer sets forth the amount he claims, including the value of each
parcel expropriated.
(3) His answer includes a certificate showing that a copy thereof has been
served personally or by mail on all parties to the suit who have not joined in the
answer.
§396.9. Encumbrances and taxes
A. Subsequent to the rendition of the ex parte order of expropriation, the
governing authority shall notify all parties having any mortgage, lien, or
encumbrance on the property of the pendency of the proceedings. Such notices shall
be sent to all such parties as may be reasonably ascertained. Notices may be sent as
provided for in this Part. The rights and interest of all creditors shall be transferred
and attach to the funds on deposit. The court may exercise summary jurisdiction to
rank the creditors according to law and their respective priority and order distribution
of the funds.
B. The expropriated property shall be vested in the governing authority free
and clear of all mortgages, liens, privileges, and encumbrances. All inscriptions for
taxes, tax liens, and governmental charges shall be canceled according to law upon
payment to the extent that the funds are available from the amount deposited into the
registry of the court. When the ex parte order vesting title in the governmental
authority becomes final, as provided in R.S. 19:396.7(B), the court shall order, upon
ex parte motion, the recorder of mortgages to cancel and erase all liens, mortgages,
and encumbrances affecting the expropriated property and shall also order the taxing
authority to cancel and erase all taxes, tax liens, and governmental charges against
the property.
§396.10. Acquisition by third persons
The governing authority shall provide an equal opportunity for all natural or
juridical persons, including but not limited to sole proprietorships, partnerships,
corporations, or limited liability companies, whether for profit or nonprofit, to
acquire property expropriated pursuant to the provisions of this Part when the
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
governing authority decides to sell, convey, or otherwise dispose of any property
expropriated pursuant to the provisions of this Part. Notwithstanding the foregoing
provisions, the governing authority may establish a preference for the allocation of
these properties to low-income families, directly or through for-profit or nonprofit
organizations which will have rehabilitated or constructed housing on the property.
§396.11. Sale of expropriated property
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing
authority may sell property acquired pursuant to this Part at public or private sale.
Before any such sale may be made, the governing authority shall enact an ordinance
generally approving the sales. The ordinance shall state whether such sales shall be
by public or private sale. If the ordinance states that a sale shall or may be by private
sale, the ordinance shall establish a fair and equitable policy with uniform
application for determining the sale price. For purposes of this Section, the sale of
property acquired pursuant to this Part shall not be considered the sale of surplus
property or of property owned by the governing authority.
§396.12. Notice of sale; private and public
A. If property is sold at private sale, the governing authority shall on a
quarterly basis publish a short description of how the governing authority is making
properties, acquired pursuant to this Part, available for purchase by the public. The
governing authority shall also publish on a quarterly basis a list of properties
acquired pursuant to this Part that have been sold by the governing authority in the
preceding quarter and shall include the name of the purchaser and the municipal
address of the property sold or, if no municipal address is available, the district, lot,
and square number, and the price at which the property was sold. If the governing
authority maintains an official website, the required quarterly notices shall also be
posted on the website and made reasonably accessible to the public.
B. If property is sold at public sale, notice of the sale shall be published at
least twice in the manner provided by law for sales under judicial process. The
advertisement of the notice of the public sale shall contain the date of the sale, the
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-821 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 284
place and time of the sale, the municipal address of the property subject to such sale
or, if no municipal address is available, the district, lot, and square number, and the
terms of the sale. If the governing authority maintains an official website, the
required notice of sale shall also be posted on the website contemporaneously to the
notice conducted in the manner provided by law for sales under judicial process.